Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4622
Disposition of unappointed property if partial appointment to taker in default.

Unless the terms of the instrument creating or exercising a power of appointment manifest a contrary intent, if the powerholder makes a valid partial appointment to a taker in default of appointment, the taker in default of appointment may share fully in unappointed property.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 45.